Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 61, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Evaluation and report. By December 1, 2024, the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy an interim report on the impact and outcomes of the grants, including the number of grants awarded and the organizations receiving the grants. The interim report must include any available evidence of how grantees were able to increase utilization of supported decision making and reduce or avoid more restrictive forms of decision making such as guardianship and conservatorship. By December 1, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , the commissioner must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services finance and policy a final report on the impact and outcomes of the grants, including any updated information from the interim report and the total number of people served by the grants. The final report must also detail how the money was used to achieve the requirements in subdivision 3, paragraph (b). Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SUPPORTED-DECISION-MAKING PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin Any unexpended amount of the fiscal year 2024 appropriation referenced in Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 9, section 2, subdivision 13, for supported-decision-making programs under Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 61, estimated to be $......., is canceled. The amount canceled is appropriated in fiscal year 2026 for the same purpose. new text end